Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. Security Guards.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing of security guards and security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60.

Collateral references. —

58 Am. Jur. 2d, Occupations, Trades and Professions, § 64.

Liability for false imprisonment or arrest of a private person answering call of known or asserted peace or police officer to assist in making arrest which turns out to be unlawful. 29 ALR2d 825.

Liability of one contracting for private police or security service for acts of personnel supplied. 38 ALR3d 1332.

Regulation of private detectives, private investigators, and security agencies. 86 ALR3d 691.

Actions of security service company’s employee as rendering company liable under contract to protect persons or property.
83 ALR4th 1150.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers. 62 ALR5th 671.

Sec. 18.65.400.
License as security guard.

A person may not be employed as a security guard or security guard agency until the person has obtained a license from the commissioner of public safety under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Sec. 18.65.410.
Applications.

Application for a license as a security guard must be made on forms provided by the commissioner. The application must require the furnishing of information reasonably required by the commissioner to carry out the provisions of AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

, including classifiable fingerprints and the fees required under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

to determine if the applicant has a criminal record. The application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of $50 for a security guard and $200 for a security guard agency.

Upon request, the commissioner shall provide a social security number provided under (a) of this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976; am § 34 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 29, 30 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 13 ch 79 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60, art. 1.

For security guards, see 13 AAC 60, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendments to this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sections 9, 14, and 17, ch. 54, SLA 2001, which were to amend (a) and repeal (b) of this section effective July 1, 2003, were repealed by § 3, ch. 37, SLA 2003.

Sec. 18.65.420.
Bonding and insurance.

As a condition to issuance of a license, the applicant or the applicant’s employer must furnish a bond or proof of a policy of insurance to protect the state and its residents from damages arising out of the acts of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60, art. 1.

For security guards, see 13 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.430.
Duration of license.

A security guard license issued under
AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

is valid for a period of two years and may be renewed for additional two-year terms.
A renewal fee of $50 shall be paid for each renewal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976; am § 35 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60, art. 1.

For security guards, see 13 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.440.
Revocation of license.

A security guard license issued under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

is subject to revocation in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for the following reasons:

false statements in an application issued under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

;

violation of a provision of AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

or a regulation adopted under AS

18.65.450

;

conviction of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude while licensed;

knowing impersonation of a law enforcement officer; or

knowingly continuing the employment of an individual as a security guard who has been convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude, or who has impersonated a law enforcement officer while employed by the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Sec. 18.65.450.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations necessary to implement AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

, including provisions specifying the amount of bond or insurance required and the types of uniforms, badges, and insignia that may be used.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60, art. 1.

For security guards, see 13 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.460.
Exceptions to licensure.

An employer is not required to seek licensure for the employer’s employees who provide unarmed plant security on that employer’s premises.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Sec. 18.65.470.
Firearms training.

Security guards licensed under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

may not be armed with a firearm for the purpose of protecting property until they have completed firearms training acceptable to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For security guard agencies, see 13 AAC 60, art. 1.

For security guards, see 13 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.480.
Penalty.

A violation of a provision of AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

or a regulation adopted under AS

18.65.450

is a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Sec. 18.65.490.
Definitions.

In AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety;

“security guard” means a person in the business of being a private watchman, providing patrol services, or providing other services designed to prevent the theft, misappropriation, or concealment of goods, money, or valuable documents;

“security guard agency” means a person in the business of furnishing for hire private watchmen, patrol services, or other services designed to prevent the theft, misappropriation, or concealment of goods, money, or valuable documents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in paragraph (2), “providing” was inserted before “other services” to correct a manifest error in ch. 59, SLA 1976.